California, session 20252026, AB2766.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66025.9 of the Education Code is amended to read:66025.9. (a) The California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to a foster youth, former foster youth, homeless youth, or former homeless youth.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Foster youth and former foster youth” means a person in California whose dependency was established or continued by a court of competent jurisdiction, including a tribal court, on or after the youth’s 13th birthday and who is no older than 25 years of age at the commencement of the academic year or is enrolled in the NextUp program established in Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7.(2) “Homeless youth and former homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of the youth’s application for admission by a postsecondary educational institution that is a qualifying institution pursuant to Section 69432.7, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:(A) A homeless services provider, as that term is defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) The director of a federal TRIO program or Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program, or a designee of that director.(C) A financial aid administrator for an institution of higher education.(D) A homeless and foster student liaison designated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 67003.5.(E) For American Indian students, a representative of the student’s tribe or a representative of a tribal organization that is a homeless services provider.(c) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a homeless youth as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the date of admission to the postsecondary educational institution.SEC. 2. Section 76010 of the Education Code is amended to read:76010. (a) In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth who are students at the campuses of the California Community Colleges have stable housing, each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities shall give priority for housing to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth. In addition, each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities open for occupation during school breaks, or on a year-round basis, shall give first priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities that are open for uninterrupted year-round occupation and provide this housing to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth at no extra cost during academic or campus breaks, and next give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for housing that is open for occupation during the most days in the calendar year.(b) In addition, each campus of the California Community Colleges is requested to develop a plan to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth can access housing resources as needed during and between academic terms, including during academic and campus breaks, regardless of whether the campus maintains student housing facilities.(c) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities shall include include, in its student housing application application, questions designed to identify students who may be eligible for priority housing pursuant to this section.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities shall defer or waive the collection of any housing-related costs required for initial occupancy for an eligible student until the student receives their disbursement of financial aid for the applicable academic term.(3) Each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing shall require, as a condition of eligibility for the deferral or waiver described in paragraph (2), that the student submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or, if applicable, a California Dream Act application, for the academic year in which the housing is sought.(4) Each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing shall not deny housing placement, cancel a housing assignment, or condition access to student housing on the prepayment of housing-related costs by an eligible student before the student receives their disbursement of financial aid for the applicable term.(5) If an eligible student does not receive a financial aid disbursement for the applicable academic term after submitting a FAFSA or, if applicable, a California Dream Act application, the community college campus may require payment of the deferred housing-related costs, provided that all of the following has occurred:(A) The campus has provided a written notice informing the student that they did not receive a financial aid disbursement for the applicable academic term.(B) The student is afforded a reasonable period of time, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the notice described in subparagraph (A), to submit payment.(C) The campus has not assessed late fees, penalties, or interest charges before expiration of the period described in subparagraph (B).(6) This subdivision does not waive a student’s ultimate responsibility for payment of housing-related costs not waived pursuant to paragraph (2), or require a campus to forgive those costs.(d) Each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities shall post on its internet website, on any web page that provides information regarding campus student housing, information describing priority housing benefits and the eligibility criteria for those benefits.(e) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Eligible student” means a student who is eligible for priority housing pursuant to this section.(2) “Homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of the student’s application for admission by a campus of the California Community Colleges, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:(A) A homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) The director, or the director’s designee, of a federal TRIO program or a Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program.(C) A financial aid administrator.(3) “Housing-related costs” include, but are not limited to, housing application fees, housing deposits, security deposits, administrative fees, or other charges required as a condition of securing or maintaining student housing.(f) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a former homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (e) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the date of admission.SEC. 3. Section 90001.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:90001.5. (a) In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth who are students at campuses of the California State University have stable housing, each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth. In addition, each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities open for occupation during school breaks, or on a year-round basis, shall first give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities that are open for uninterrupted year-round occupation and provide this housing to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth at no extra cost during academic or campus breaks, and next give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for housing that is open for occupation during the most days in the calendar year.(b) In addition, each campus of the California State University is requested to develop a plan to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth can access housing resources as needed during and between academic terms, including during academic and campus breaks, regardless of whether the campus maintains student housing facilities.(c) (1) Each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall include include, in its student housing application application, questions designed to identify students who may be eligible for priority housing pursuant to this section.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall defer or waive the collection of any housing-related costs required for initial occupancy for an eligible student until the student receives their disbursement of financial aid for the applicable academic term.(3) Each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall require, as a condition of eligibility for the deferral or waiver described in paragraph (2), that the student submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or, if applicable, a California Dream Act application, for the academic year for which the housing is sought.(4) Each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall not deny housing placement, cancel a housing assignment, or condition access to student housing on the prepayment of housing-related costs by an eligible student before the student receives their disbursement of financial aid for the applicable term.(5) If an eligible student does not receive a financial aid disbursement for the applicable academic term after submitting a FAFSA or, if applicable, a California Dream Act application, the California State University campus may require payment of the deferred housing-related costs, provided that all of the following has occurred:(A) The campus has provided a written notice informing the student that they did not receive a financial aid disbursement for the applicable academic term.(B) The student is afforded a reasonable period of time, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the notice described in subparagraph (A), to submit payment.(C) The campus has not assessed late fees, penalties, or interest charges before expiration of the period described in subparagraph (B).(6) This subdivision does not waive a student’s ultimate responsibility for payment of housing-related costs not waived pursuant to paragraph (2), or require a campus to forgive those costs.(d) Each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall post on its internet website, on any web page that provides information regarding campus student housing, information describing priority housing benefits and the eligibility criteria for those benefits.(e) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Eligible student” means a student who is eligible for priority housing pursuant to this section.(2) “Homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of the student’s application for admission by a campus of the California State University, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:(A) A homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) The director, or the director’s designee, of a federal TRIO program or a Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program.(C) A financial aid administrator.(3) “Housing-related costs” include, but are not limited to, housing application fees, housing deposits, security deposits, administrative fees, or other charges required as a condition of securing or maintaining student housing.(f) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a former homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (e) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the date of admission.SEC. 4. Section 92660 of the Education Code is amended to read:92660. (a) In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth who are students at campuses of the University of California have stable housing, each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities shall give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth. In addition, each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities open for occupation during school breaks, or on a year-round basis, shall first give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities for which they are eligible that are open for uninterrupted year-round occupation and provide this housing to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth at no extra cost during academic or campus breaks, and next give priority to current or former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities for which they are eligible that are open for occupation during the most days in the calendar year.(b) In addition, a campus of the University of California is requested to develop a plan to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth can access housing resources as needed during and between academic terms, including during academic and campus breaks, regardless of whether the campus maintains student housing facilities.(c) (1) Each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities shall include include, in its student housing application application, questions designed to identify students who may be eligible for priority housing pursuant to this section.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities shall defer or waive the collection of any housing-related costs required for initial occupancy for an eligible student until the student receives their disbursement of financial aid for the applicable academic term.(3) Each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities shall require, as a condition of eligibility for the deferral or waiver described in paragraph (2), that the student submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or, if applicable, a California Dream Act application, for the academic year in which the housing is sought.(4) Each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities shall not deny housing placement, cancel a housing assignment, or condition access to student housing on the prepayment of housing-related costs by an eligible student before the student receives disbursement of financial aid for the applicable term.(5) If an eligible student does not receive a financial aid disbursement for the applicable academic term after submitting a FAFSA or, if applicable, a California Dream Act application, the University of California campus may require payment of the deferred housing-related costs, provided that all of the following has occurred:(A) The campus has provided a written notice informing the student that they did not receive a financial aid disbursement for the applicable academic term.(B) The student is afforded a reasonable period of time, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the notice described in subparagraph (A), to submit payment.(C) The campus has not assessed late fees, penalties, or interest charges before expiration of the period described in subparagraph (B).(6) This subdivision does not waive a student’s ultimate responsibility for payment of housing-related costs not waived pursuant to paragraph (2), or require a campus to forgive those costs.(d) Each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities is requested to post on its internet website, on any web page that provides information regarding campus student housing, information describing priority housing benefits and the eligibility criteria for those benefits.(e) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Eligible student” means a student who is eligible for priority housing pursuant to this section.(2) “Homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of the student’s application for admission by a campus of the University of California, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:(A) A homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) The director, or the director’s designee, of a federal TRIO program or a Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program.(C) A financial aid administrator.(3) “Housing-related costs” include, but are not limited to, housing application fees, housing deposits, security deposits, administrative fees, or other charges required as a condition of securing or maintaining student housing.(f) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a former homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (e) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the date of admission.(g) This section shall not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make this section applicable.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.